Illinois, session 104th, HB4705.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Artificial Intelligence Public Safety and Child Protection 6Transparency Act. 7    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds and 8declares:9    (a) Artificial intelligence, including new advances in 10foundation models, has the potential to catalyze innovation 11and the rapid development of a wide range of benefits for 12Illinoisans and the Illinois economy, including advances in 13medicine, agriculture, and climate science, and to push the 14bounds of human creativity and capacity.15    (b) Targeted interventions to support effective artificial 16intelligence governance should balance the technology's 17benefits and the potential for material risks.18    (c) In building a robust and transparent evidence 19environment, policymakers can align incentives to 20simultaneously protect consumers, leverage industry expertise, 21and recognize leading safety practices.22    (d) As industry actors conduct internal research on their 23technologies' impacts, public trust in these technologies   HB4705- 2 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1would significantly benefit from access to information 2regarding, and increased awareness of, frontier artificial 3intelligence capabilities.4    (e) Greater transparency can also advance accountability, 5competition, and public trust.6    (f) Whistleblower protections and public-facing 7information sharing are key instruments to increase 8transparency.9    (g) Incident reporting systems enable monitoring of the 10post-deployment impacts of artificial intelligence.11    (h) Unless they are developed with careful diligence and 12reasonable precaution, there is concern that advanced 13artificial intelligence systems could have capabilities that 14pose catastrophic risks from both malicious uses and 15malfunctions, including artificial intelligence-enabled 16hacking, biological attacks, and loss of control.17    (i) With the frontier of artificial intelligence rapidly 18evolving, there is a need for legislation to track the 19frontier of artificial intelligence research and alert 20policymakers and the public to serious risks and harms from 21the most advanced artificial intelligence systems, while 22avoiding burdening smaller companies behind the frontier.23    (j) While the major artificial intelligence developers 24have already voluntarily established the creation, use, and 25publication of frontier artificial intelligence frameworks as 26an industry best practice, not all developers have provided   HB4705- 3 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1reporting that is consistent and sufficient to ensure 2necessary transparency and protection of the public. 3Mandatory, standardized, and objective reporting by frontier 4developers is required to provide the government and the 5public with timely and accurate information.6    (k) Timely reporting of critical safety incidents to the 7government is essential to ensure that public authorities are 8promptly informed of ongoing and emerging risks to public 9safety. This reporting enables the government to monitor, 10assess, and respond effectively if the advanced capabilities 11emerge in frontier artificial intelligence models that may 12pose a threat to the public.13    (l) In the future, foundation models developed by smaller 14companies or that are behind the frontier may pose significant 15catastrophic risk, and additional legislation may be needed at 16that time.17    (m) It is the intent of the General Assembly to create more 18transparency, but collective safety will depend in part on 19frontier developers taking due care in their development and 20deployment of frontier models proportional to the scale of the 21foreseeable risks. 22    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:23    "Affiliate" means a person controlling, controlled by, or 24under common control with a specified person, directly or 25indirectly, through one or more intermediaries.  HB4705- 4 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1    "Artificial intelligence model" means an engineered or 2machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and 3that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the 4input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence 5physical or virtual environments.6    "Catastrophic risk" means a foreseeable and material risk 7that a frontier developer's development, storage, use, or 8deployment of a frontier model will materially contribute to 9the death of, or serious injury to, more than 50 people or more 10than $1,000,000,000 in damage to, or loss of, property arising 11from a single incident involving a frontier model doing the 12following:13        (1) providing expert-level assistance in the creation 14    or release of a chemical, biological, radiological, or 15    nuclear weapon;16        (2) engaging in conduct with no meaningful human 17    oversight, intervention, or supervision that is either a 18    cyberattack or, if the conduct had been committed by a 19    human, would constitute the crime of murder, assault, 20    extortion, or theft, including theft by false pretense; or21        (3) evading the control of its frontier developer or 22    user.23    "Catastrophic risk" does not include a foreseeable and 24material risk from the following:25        (1) information that a frontier model outputs if the 26    information is otherwise publicly accessible in a   HB4705- 5 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1    substantially similar form from a source other than a 2    foundation model;3        (2) lawful activity of the federal government; or4        (3) harm caused by a frontier model in combination 5    with other software if the frontier model did not 6    materially contribute to the harm.7    "Child safety incident" means death or bodily injury to a 8minor resulting from the materialization of a child safety 9risk.10    "Child safety risk" means a material and foreseeable risk 11that a frontier developer's foundation model, when used as 12part of a covered chatbot operated by the frontier developer, 13will engage in behavior when conversing with a minor that, if 14it had been engaged in by a human, would be deemed to 15intentionally or recklessly do the following:16        (1) cause death or bodily injury to that minor, 17    including as a result of self-harm; or18        (2) cause damage to mental health that constitutes 19    severe emotional distress.20    "Covered chatbot" means a service that:21        (1) allows an ordinary person to converse with and 22    have conversations where humanlike responses are generated 23    by a foundation model;24        (2) is foreseeably likely to be accessed by minors; 25    and26        (3) has at least 1,000,000 monthly active users.  HB4705- 6 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1    "Covered risk" means a catastrophic risk or a child safety 2risk.3    "Critical safety incident" means the following:4        (1) unauthorized access to, modification of, 5    inadvertent release of, or exfiltration of, the model 6    weights of a frontier model;7        (2) the death of, or serious injury to, more than 50 8    people or more than $1,000,000,000 in damage to, or loss 9    of, property resulting from the materialization of a 10    catastrophic risk;11        (3) loss of control of a frontier model that causes 12    death, bodily injury, or that demonstrates materially 13    increased catastrophic risk; or14        (4) the use of deceptive techniques by a frontier 15    model against its frontier developer to subvert the 16    controls or monitoring of its frontier developer outside 17    of the context of an evaluation designed to elicit this 18    behavior and in a manner that demonstrates materially 19    increased catastrophic risk.20    "Deploy" means to make a frontier model available to a 21third party for use, modification, copying, or combination 22with other software. "Deploy" does not include making a 23frontier model available to a third party for the primary 24purpose of developing or evaluating the frontier model.25    "Employee" has the meaning set forth in the Whistleblower 26Act.  HB4705- 7 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1    "Foundation model" means an artificial intelligence model 2that is:3        (1) trained on a broad data set;4        (2) designed for generality of output; and5        (3) adaptable to a wide range of distinctive tasks.6    "Frontier developer" means a person who has trained, or 7initiated the training of, a frontier model, with respect to 8which the person has used, or intends to use, at least as much 9computing power to train the frontier model as would meet the 10technical specifications described in the definition of 11"frontier model". "Frontier developer" does not include 12accredited colleges and universities to the extent that the 13colleges and universities are engaging in academic research. 14For the purpose of this definition, if a person subsequently 15transfers full intellectual property rights of a frontier 16model to another person, including the right to resell the 17model, and retains none of those rights, then the receiving 18person shall be considered the frontier developer with respect 19to that frontier model.20    "Frontier model" means a foundation model that was trained 21using a quantity of computing power greater than 10^26 integer 22or floating-point operations. The quantity of computing power 23described in this definition shall include computing for the 24original training run and for any subsequent fine-tuning, 25reinforcement learning, or other material modifications the 26developer applies to a preceding foundation model.  HB4705- 8 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1    "Large chatbot provider" means a provider who makes a 2covered chatbot available in this State and who, together with 3the provider's affiliates, collectively have an annual revenue 4of at least $25,000,000.5    "Large frontier developer" means a frontier developer who, 6together with the large frontier developer's affiliates, 7collectively have an annual revenue of at least $500,000,000.8    "Minor" means an individual younger than 18 years old.9    "Model weight" means a numerical parameter in a frontier 10model that is adjusted through training and that helps 11determine how inputs are transformed into outputs.12    "Property" means tangible or intangible property.13    "Public safety and child protection plan" means a 14documented technical and organizational protocol to manage, 15assess, and mitigate covered risks.16    "Safety incident" means a child safety incident or a 17critical safety incident. 18    Section 15. Public safety and child protection plans.19     (a) A large frontier developer or large chatbot provider 20shall write, implement, comply with, and clearly and 21conspicuously publish on its website a public safety and child 22protection plan that describes in detail:23        (1) For a large frontier developer only, how the large 24    frontier developer:25            (A) defines and assesses thresholds used by the   HB4705- 9 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1        large frontier developer to identify and assess 2        whether a frontier model has capabilities that could 3        pose a catastrophic risk, which may include 4        multiple-tiered thresholds;5            (B) applies mitigations to address the potential 6        for catastrophic risks based on the results of the 7        assessments undertaken in accordance with subparagraph 8        (A);9            (C) reviews assessments of catastrophic risk and 10        adequacy of mitigations of catastrophic risk as part 11        of the decision to deploy a frontier model or use it 12        extensively internally;13            (D) uses third parties to assess the potential for 14        catastrophic risks and the effectiveness of 15        mitigations of catastrophic risks;16            (E) implements cybersecurity practices to secure 17        unreleased frontier model weights from unauthorized 18        modification or transfer by internal or external 19        parties; and20            (F) assesses and manages catastrophic risk 21        resulting from the internal use of its frontier 22        models, including risks resulting from a frontier 23        model circumventing oversight mechanisms or being used 24        for artificial intelligence research and development 25        in a manner that could materially increase 26        catastrophic risk.  HB4705- 10 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1        (2) For a large chatbot provider only, how the large 2    chatbot provider:3            (A) assesses potential for child safety risks;4            (B) applies mitigations to address the potential 5        for child safety risks based on the results of the 6        assessments undertaken in accordance with subparagraph 7        (A); and8            (C) uses third parties to assess the potential for 9        child safety risks and the effectiveness of 10        mitigations of child safety risks.11        (3) For both large frontier developers and large 12    chatbot providers, how the large frontier developer or 13    large chatbot provider:14            (A) incorporates national standards, international 15        standards, and industry-consensus best practices into 16        its public safety and child protection plan;17            (B) revisits and updates the public safety and 18        child protection plan, including any criteria that 19        trigger updates and how the large frontier developer 20        determines when its foundation models or frontier 21        models are substantially modified enough to require 22        disclosures in accordance with subsection (d) or 23        subsection (e);24            (C) identifies and responds to safety incidents; 25        and26            (D) institutes internal governance practices to   HB4705- 11 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1        ensure implementation of these processes.2    (b) A large frontier developer shall write its public 3safety and child protection plan so that, if successfully 4implemented, it would prevent unreasonable catastrophic risk.5    (c) If a large frontier developer or large chatbot 6provider makes a material modification to its public safety 7and child protection plan, the large frontier developer or 8large chatbot provider shall clearly and conspicuously publish 9the modified public safety and child protection plan and a 10justification for that modification within 30 days after the 11modification is made.12    (d) Before, or concurrently with, integrating a new 13foundation model, or a version of an existing foundation model 14that has been substantially modified, into a covered chatbot 15operated by a large chatbot provider, a large chatbot provider 16shall conspicuously publish on its website summaries of the 17following:18        (1) all assessments of child safety risks conducted in 19    accordance with the large chatbot provider's public safety 20    and child protection plan;21        (2) the results of those assessments;22        (3) the extent to which third-party evaluators were 23    involved; and24        (4) other steps taken to fulfill the requirements of 25    the public safety and child protection plan with respect 26    to child safety risks.  HB4705- 12 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1    (e) Before, or concurrently with, deploying a new frontier 2model or a version of an existing frontier model that a large 3frontier developer has substantially modified, a large 4frontier developer shall implement appropriate safeguards to 5prevent unreasonable catastrophic risk and conspicuously 6publish on its website summaries of the following:7        (1) all assessments of catastrophic risks from the 8    frontier model conducted in accordance with the large 9    frontier developer's public safety and child protection 10    plan;11        (2) the results of those assessments;12        (3) the extent to which third-party evaluators were 13    involved; and14        (4) other steps taken to fulfill the requirements of 15    the public safety and child protection plan with respect 16    to catastrophic risks from the frontier model.17    A large frontier developer that publishes the information 18described in this subsection as part of a larger document, 19including a system card or model card, shall be deemed in 20compliance with this subsection.21    (f) A large frontier developer shall not use or deploy a 22frontier model if doing so would pose unreasonable 23catastrophic risk.24    (g) A large frontier developer or large chatbot provider 25shall not make a materially false or misleading statement or 26omission about covered risks from its activities or its   HB4705- 13 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1management of covered risks.2    A large frontier developer or large chatbot provider shall 3not make a materially false or misleading statement or 4omission about its implementation of, or compliance with, its 5public safety and child protection plan.6    This subsection does not apply to a statement that was 7made in good faith and was reasonable under the circumstances.8    (h) When a large frontier developer or large chatbot 9provider publishes documents to comply with this Section, the 10large frontier developer or large chatbot provider may make 11redactions to those documents that are necessary to protect 12the large frontier developer's or large chatbot provider's 13trade secrets, the large frontier developer's or large chatbot 14provider's cybersecurity, public safety, or the national 15security of the United States or to comply with any State or 16federal law. If a large frontier developer or large chatbot 17provider redacts information in a document under this 18subsection, the large frontier developer or large chatbot 19provider shall describe the character and justification of the 20redaction in any published version of the document to the 21extent permitted by the concerns that justify redaction and 22shall retain the unredacted information for 5 years. 23    Section 20. Reporting of safety incidents.24     (a) The Attorney General shall establish a mechanism to 25be used by a frontier developer, a large chatbot provider, or a   HB4705- 14 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1member of the public to report a safety incident that includes 2the following:3        (1) the date of the safety incident;4        (2) the reasons the incident qualifies as a safety 5    incident; and6        (3) a short and plain statement describing the safety 7    incident.8    (b) A frontier developer shall report any critical safety 9incident pertaining to one of its frontier models to the 10Attorney General within 15 days after discovering the critical 11safety incident.12    (c) If a frontier developer discovers that a critical 13safety incident poses an imminent risk of death or serious 14physical injury, the frontier developer shall disclose that 15incident within 24 hours after discovering the critical safety 16incident to an authority, including any law enforcement agency 17or public safety agency with jurisdiction, that is appropriate 18based on the nature of that incident and as required by law.19    (d) A large chatbot provider shall report any child safety 20incident pertaining to one of its covered chatbots to the 21Attorney General within 15 days after discovering the child 22safety incident.23    (e) The Attorney General shall establish a mechanism to be 24used by a large frontier developer to confidentially submit 25summaries of any assessments of the potential for catastrophic 26risk resulting from internal use of its frontier models.  HB4705- 15 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1    (f) A large frontier developer shall transmit to the 2Attorney General a summary of any assessment of catastrophic 3risk resulting from internal use of its frontier models no 4less frequently than every 3 months.5    (g) The Attorney General may transmit reports of safety 6incidents, summaries of assessments of the potential for 7catastrophic risk from internal use, and reports from 8employees to the General Assembly, the Governor, the federal 9government, or an appropriate State agency. The Attorney 10General shall consider any risks related to trade secrets, 11public safety, cybersecurity, or national security when 12transmitting reports. 13    Section 25. Rulemaking; definitions.14    (a) On or before January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, 15the Attorney General shall assess recent evidence and 16developments relevant to the purposes of this Act and may 17adopt rules to update the following definitions for the 18purposes of this Act to ensure that they accurately reflect 19technological developments, scientific literature, and widely 20accepted national and international standards:21        (1) "Frontier model" so that it applies to foundation 22    models at the frontier of artificial intelligence 23    development.24        (2) "Frontier developer" so that it applies to 25    developers of frontier models who are themselves at the   HB4705- 16 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1    frontier of artificial intelligence development.2        (3) "Large frontier developer" so that it applies to 3    well-resourced frontier developers.4        (4) "Large chatbot provider" so that it applies to 5    well-resourced companies developing covered chatbots that 6    may pose child safety risks.7    (b) In adopting rules under this Section, the Attorney 8General shall take into account the following:9        (1) similar thresholds used in international standards 10    or federal law, regulations, or guidance documents for the 11    management of catastrophic risks or child safety risks;12        (2) input from stakeholders, including academics, 13    industry, the open-source community, and governmental 14    entities;15        (3) the extent to which a person will be able to 16    determine, before beginning to train or deploy a 17    foundation model, whether that person will be subject to 18    this Act as a frontier developer or as a large frontier 19    developer with a focus toward allowing earlier 20    determinations if possible;21        (4) the complexity of determining whether a person or 22    foundation model is covered, with a focus toward allowing 23    simpler determinations if possible;24        (5) the external verifiability of determining whether 25    a person or foundation model is covered, with a focus 26    toward definitions that are verifiable by parties other   HB4705- 17 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1    than the frontier developer; and2        (6) thresholds used by other states in similar law.3    (c) The Attorney General shall align any rules adopted 4under this Section with a definition adopted in a federal law 5or regulation, to the extent that it is consistent with the 6purposes of this Act. 7    Section 30. Protection of whistleblowers.8    (a) A frontier developer or large chatbot provider shall 9not make, adopt, enforce, or enter into a rule, regulation, 10policy, or contract that prevents an employee from making a 11disclosure protected under the Whistleblower Act.12    (b) A large frontier developer shall provide a reasonable 13internal process through which an employee may anonymously 14disclose information to the large frontier developer if the 15employee has a good faith belief that the information 16discloses a substantial and specific danger to employees, 17public health, or safety or a violation of this Act, including 18a monthly update to the person who made the disclosure 19regarding the status of the large frontier developer's 20investigation of the disclosure and the actions taken by the 21large frontier developer in response to the disclosure.22    (c) Except as provided in subsection (d), the disclosures 23and responses of the process required by this Section shall be 24shared with officers and directors of the large frontier 25developer at least once each quarter.  HB4705- 18 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1    (d) If an employee has alleged wrongdoing by an officer or 2director of the large frontier developer in a disclosure or 3response, subsection (c) shall not apply with respect to that 4officer or director. 5    Section 35. Third-party audits.6    (a) At least once every calendar year, a large frontier 7developer shall retain a reputable third-party auditor to 8produce a report assessing the following:9        (1) whether the large frontier developer has complied 10    with its public safety plan and any instances of 11    noncompliance;12        (2) any instances where the large frontier developer's 13    public safety plan has not been stated clearly enough to 14    determine whether the large frontier developer has 15    complied; and16        (3) whether redactions made by the large frontier 17    developer in documents published in accordance with this 18    Act are reasonable and whether any statements made by the 19    large frontier developer may be false or misleading.20    (b) A large frontier developer shall allow the third-party 21auditor access to all materials produced to comply with this 22Act and any other materials reasonably necessary to perform 23the assessment required under subsection (a).24    (c) The large frontier developer shall retain the 25auditor's report for 5 years and allow the Attorney General to   HB4705- 19 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1inspect the unredacted version of the report upon request.2    (d) In conducting the audit, the auditor shall employ or 3contract one or more individuals with expertise in corporate 4compliance and one or more individuals with technical 5expertise in the safety of foundation models. 6    Section 40. Civil penalties.7    (a) A large frontier developer that violates this Act 8shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount dependent upon 9the severity of the violation that does not exceed $1,000,000 10per violation.11    (b) A large chatbot provider that violates this Act shall 12be subject to a civil penalty in an amount dependent upon the 13severity of the violation that does not exceed $50,000 per 14violation.15    (c) A civil penalty described in this Section shall be 16recovered in a civil action brought by the Attorney General. 17    Section 45. Loss of equity. The loss of value of equity 18does not count as damage to or loss of property for the 19purposes of this Act. 20    Section 50. Compliance with other laws.21    (a) The Attorney General may adopt rules creating 22alternative compliance pathways for frontier developers or 23large chatbot providers that comply with a federal law,   HB4705- 20 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1regulation, or guidance document or a law of another state of 2the United States.3    (b) A rule adopted under this Section shall:4        (1) Specify the provisions of this Act for which the 5    alternative compliance pathway is being established.6        (2) Specify the federal law, regulation, or guidance 7    document, or the law of another state, compliance with 8    which shall serve as the alternative compliance pathway 9    for the provisions specified under paragraph (1). The 10    federal law, regulation or guidance document or the law of 11    another state shall be substantially equivalent to, or 12    more protective against catastrophic risk than, the 13    provisions of this Act specified under paragraph (1).14    (c) If a rule adopted under this Section identifies, as 15described in paragraph (1) of subsection (b), a provision of 16this Act that requires reporting to the State and if the 17alternative compliance pathway requires reporting to the 18federal government, the rule may, but need not, continue to 19require reporting to the State. The rule shall not consider 20reporting to another state to be sufficient for compliance 21with the relevant provision of this Act.22    (d) A rule adopted under this Section may establish steps 23frontier developers or large chatbot providers must take to 24demonstrate their compliance with the alternative compliance 25pathway if it would otherwise be challenging for the State to 26verify compliance, such as the submission of documentation to   HB4705- 21 -LRB104 16697 SPS 30101 b1the State.2    (e) A frontier developer or large chatbot provider that 3intends to make use of an alternative compliance pathway 4created by rule under this Section shall declare its intent to 5do so to the Attorney General.6    After declaring its intent, a frontier developer or large 7chatbot provider shall be deemed in compliance with the 8provision of this Act identified by the rule under paragraph 9(1) of subsection (b) to the extent that the frontier 10developer or large chatbot provider complies with the 11requirements of the rule and meets the standards of, or 12complies with the requirements imposed or stated by, the 13federal law, regulation, or guidance document or law of 14another state identified by the rule under paragraph (2) of 15subsection (b) until the frontier developer or large chatbot 16provider declares the revocation of that intent to the 17Attorney General or the Attorney General revokes the rule in 18accordance with subsection (f).19    (f) The Attorney General shall revoke a rule adopted under 20this Section if the conditions specified by this Section no 21longer apply. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 231, 2027.